Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-708
Wires; violation; penalty; enforcement.

Any person who strings or maintains any wire across any railroad right-of-way in this state at a different height or in a different manner than that prescribed by the commission, shall forfeit and pay to the State of Nebraska the sum of one hundred dollars for each separate period of ten days during which such wire is so maintained, such forfeiture to be recovered in a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the name of the State of Nebraska, by the Attorney General, or by the county attorney of the county in which the wire is situated, at the request of the commission. The Attorney General and the respective county attorneys shall bring such action forthwith upon being so requested.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 8, p. 1423;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 120.